Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB747.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1543(b)(1) of Title 64 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1543. Indebtedness.* * *(b) Program limitations.--Indebtedness incurred by the authority under subsection (a) shall not, in aggregate, exceed any of the following:(1) [$300,000,000] $375,000,000 for the program established in section 1551 (relating to Business in Our Sites Program).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.123456789101112131415161718